Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.250

Certificated employees of district—Contracts of employment—Nonrenewal of contracts—Notice.

No certificated employee of an educational service district shall be employed as such except by written contract, which shall be in conformity with the laws of this state. Every such contract shall be made in duplicate, one copy of which shall be retained by the educational service district superintendent and the other shall be delivered to the employee.

Every educational service district superintendent or board determining that there is probable cause or causes that the employment contract of a certificated employee thereof is not to be renewed for the next ensuing term shall be notified in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such term of that determination or if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by the end of the regular legislative session for that year, then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification shall specify the cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract. Such notice shall be served upon that employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. The procedure and standards for the review of the decision of the hearing officer, superintendent or board and appeal therefrom shall be as prescribed for nonrenewal cases of teachers in RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380, and 28A.645.010. Appeals may be filed in the superior court of any county in the educational service district.

[ 2016 c 85 s 5; 2009 c 57 s 4; 1996 c 201 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 280; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 22; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 11; 1971 c 48 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 19. Formerly RCW 28A.21.105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 85: See note following RCW 28A.405.210.

Effective date—2009 c 57: See note following RCW 28A.405.210.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.

Severability—1971 c 48: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 c 48 s 55.]